Utah statutes.
31A-37-601.   Incorporation of a captive reinsurance company.
(1)  A captive reinsurance company shall be incorporated as a stock insurer
with its capital:
(a)  divided into shares; and
(b)  held by the captive reinsurance company's shareholders.
(2) (a)  A captive reinsurance company may not have fewer than three
incorporators.
(b)  At least two of the incorporators of a captive reinsurance company must
be residents of this state.
(3) (a)  Before the articles of incorporation are filed with the Division of
Corporations and Commercial Code, the incorporators shall obtain from the
commissioner a certificate of finding that the establishment and maintenance
of the proposed corporation promotes the general good of this state.
(b)  In considering a request for a certificate under Subsection (3)(a), the
commissioner shall consider:
(i)  the character, reputation, financial standing, and purposes of the
incorporators;
(ii)  the character, reputation, financial responsibility, insurance
experience, and business qualifications of the officers and directors; and
(iii)  other factors the commissioner considers advisable.
(4)  The capital stock of a captive reinsurance company must be issued at par
value or greater.
(5)  At least one of the members of the board of directors of a captive
reinsurance company incorporated in this state must be a resident of this
state.
